Utah statutes.
72-10-202.   Cooperation with counties, municipalities, and federal government -- Expenditures by division.

(1)  The division may:

(a)  cooperate with counties and municipalities in developing and constructing airports;

(b)  make agreements on behalf of the state with any county or municipality regarding the financial participation, construction, and operation of any airports;

(c)  cooperate with the federal government in establishing airports; and

(d)  accept from the United States of America, money to be matched with the funds of the state and funds appropriated by any county or municipality in developing and constructing airports under the Uniform Airports Act.

(2)  The division may expend not to exceed 10% of its annual appropriation upon any one project under this chapter.

